Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 1, chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $1,448,157.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to  the Office of the Governor, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $175,000 for expenses related to forest mediation sessions.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to  the State Forestry Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $844,545 for expenses  related to notifications for pesticide ap-
plication by helicopter to forestland.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of $70,362
is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and includ-
ing federal funds from the United States Forest Service for  fire protection and for research
projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not  described in this section, collected
or received by the State Forestry Department, for  expenses related to notifications for pes-
ticide application by helicopter to forestland.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  State Department of Agriculture by section 1 (2), chapter 452, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, for food safety, is increased by $237,648 for the es-
tablishment of a state inspection program for the processing and sale of meat products.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for central services and state  assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $137,042 for the purpose of licensing  and monitoring
out-of-state child-caring agencies.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (3), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for child welfare, is increased by $53,922  for costs
associated with managing out-of-state placements and covering service payments.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5711 (SB 5711-A) Page 1
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (5), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of  Human Services, for shared services, is increased by $119,328 for the purpose of li-
censing and monitoring out-of-state child-caring agencies.
SECTION 9. This 2020 special session Act being necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health  and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2020 special
session Act takes effect on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5711 (SB 5711-A) Page 2